District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Funeral Services Modernization Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Funeral Services Regulatory Act of 1984, effective
May 22, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-84; D.C. Official Code § 3-401 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 3-401) is amended by striking the phrase “apprentice
funeral directors,” and inserting the phrase “embalmers, apprenticeships,” in its place.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 3-402) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is repealed.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “for the District of Columbia”
and inserting the phrase “established by D.C. Official Code § 47-2853.06(f)” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (7A) is added to read as follows:
“(7A) “Embalmer” means a person licensed in the District to perform the practice
of embalming.”.
(4) Paragraph (9) is amended to read as follows:
“(9) “Funeral director” means a person licensed by the District to perform the
practice of funeral directing.”.
(5) Paragraph (14) is amended to read as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(14) “License” means an authority from the District which entitles the holder to
practice in the District as a funeral director or an embalmer, or an authority from the District
which entitles the holder to own and operate a funeral services establishment.”.
(6) A new paragraph (17A) is added to read as follows:
“(17A) “Practice of embalming” means engaging in the disposal of human
remains by chemically treating the human remains by arterial injection and cavity treatment or,
when necessary, hypodermic tissue injection to reduce the presence and growth of
microorganisms to temporarily delay organic decomposition.”.
(7) Paragraph (18) is amended to read as follows:
“(18) “Practice of funeral directing” means the for-profit profession of directing
or supervising funerals, preparing human dead for burial by means other than through the
practice of embalming, including by burial, cremation, and alkaline hydrolysis, or making
arrangements for funeral services or the financing of funeral services.”.
(c) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-404(a)) is amended by striking the phrase
“practice of funeral directing” and inserting the phrase “practices of funeral directing and
embalming” in its place.
(d) Section 6 (D.C. Official Code § 3-405) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) are amended to read as follows:
“(2) Has completed a funeral director apprenticeship;
“(3) Is a graduate of a school of mortuary science or funeral service accredited by
the American Board of Funeral Service Education or an accrediting agency approved by the U.S.
Department of Education or have completed an associate’s degree or its equivalent, which
consists of at least 60 credit hours of coursework, of which at least 30 hours shall be from a
funeral directing program approved by the Board;
“(4) Has passed the Arts section of the National Board Examination administered
by the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards;”.
(B) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the
phrase “; and” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (7) is repealed.
(2) Subsection (d) is repealed.
(3) New subsections (d-1) and (d-2) are added to read as follows:
“(d-1) Embalmer’s license. – An applicant for licensure as an embalmer shall furnish
proof satisfactory to the Mayor that he or she:
“(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
“(2) Has completed an embalming apprenticeship;
“(3) Is a graduate of a school of mortuary science or funeral service accredited by
the American Board of Funeral Service Education or an accrediting agency approved by the U.S.
Department of Education or have completed an embalming program approved by the Board;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) Has passed the Sciences section of the National Board Examination
administered by the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards;
“(5) Is fully acquainted with District and federal laws relating to the practice of
embalming;
“(6) Has paid all required fees; and
“(7) Has met any additional requirements set by the Mayor.
“(d-2) Notwithstanding subsection (d-1) of this section, a person licensed as a funeral
director prior to the effective date of this subsection shall automatically receive an embalmer’s
license.”.
(4) Subsection (e)(5) is amended by striking the phrase “, apprentice funeral
directors,” and inserting the phrase “, embalmers, certified apprentices,” in its place.
(5) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “and apprentice
funeral director’s license” and inserting the phrase “, embalmer’s license, or certificate of
apprenticeship” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “an apprentice funeral
director’s license,” and inserting the phrase “an embalmer’s license, a certificate of
apprenticeship,” in its place.
(6) Subsection (i) is amended to read as follows:
“(i)(1) The Board may issue a license to:
“(A) Practice as a funeral director in the District to an applicant who is
licensed by another state by waiver of the examination and apprenticeship requirements of
subsection (a) of this section; or
“(B) Practice as an embalmer in the District to an applicant who is
licensed by another state by waiver of the examination and apprenticeship requirements of
subsection (d-1) of this section.
“(2) An applicant for a license to practice as a funeral director or embalmer in the
District shall furnish proof to the Board that he or she:
“(A) Is currently in good standing as a funeral director or embalmer in a
state or territory of the United States with requirements for licensure that are substantially similar
to those in effect in the District;
“(B) Is at least 18 years of age;
“(C) Has paid all required fees; and
“(D) Is fully acquainted with District and federal laws relating to the
license sought.”.
(e) Section 7(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-406(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) A license to practice in the District as either a funeral director or embalmer, or to
operate a funeral services establishment, shall be issued to each applicant who meets all of the
requirements for licensure.”.
(f) Section 8 (D.C. Official Code § 3-407) is amended to read as follows:
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Sec. 8. Apprenticeships.
“(a)(1) A person seeking to qualify:
“(A) As a funeral director, shall serve as an apprentice under the direct
supervision of a funeral director licensed in the District; or
“(B) As an embalmer, shall serve as an apprentice under the direct
supervision of an embalmer licensed in the District.
“(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, an apprentice who is
required to serve a 2-year minimum apprenticeship may serve up to one year of the
apprenticeship outside of the District, if the period of the apprenticeship served outside of the
District is served under the supervision of an individual who has passed the National Board
Exam administered by the International Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards.
“(b) To qualify for an apprenticeship, the applicant shall furnish proof that he or she:
“(1) Is at least 18 years of age; and
“(2) Holds a high school diploma or its equivalent, or higher.
“(c) An apprenticeship for funeral directing or embalming shall consist of at least 2,000
hours of training to be completed in 2 years; except, that an apprenticeship may be extended, for
good cause, to no more than 4 years .
“(d) A funeral directing apprentice shall receive training in all aspects of the practice of
funeral directing, including assisting with at least 25 funerals and 25 arrangement conferences,
visitations, and the financing of funeral services.
“(e) An embalming apprentice shall receive training in all aspects of the practice of
embalming, including assisting in at least 25 embalmings, treatment, restorative art, safety and
sanitation, and organ, tissue, or anatomical donations.
“(f)(1) The apprentice and the licensee supervising the apprentice shall submit a written
report to the Board at the end of every 1,000 hours of training that specifies the period of time in
which the 1,000 hours has been completed and verifies that the apprentice has actually served in
the required capacity during the preceding period. The report shall be submitted no more than 30
days following the completion of the 1,000 hours.
“(2) An apprentice shall not receive credit for any new training hours until the
previous 1,000-hour report has been submitted and approved.
“(g) An apprentice whose employment under the supervision of a funeral director or
embalmer is terminated shall, within 30 days of being employed to work under the supervision of
another funeral director or embalmer, notify the Mayor of the change of employment and the
name, address, and license number of the funeral director or embalmer under whose supervision
the apprentice is continuing his or her apprenticeship.
“(h) A funeral director or embalmer shall, upon employing an apprentice or terminating
the employment of an apprentice, notify the Mayor in writing. The notification shall contain the
name and address of the apprentice, and the date on which the apprentice was employed or
terminated.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(i) The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this section, including the
establishment of fees for apprenticeship applications, pursuant to section 22a.”.
(g) Section 9(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-408(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The Mayor may refuse to approve or issue a renewal of a license, or may order
restrictions, impose a fine, impose conditions on the practices of funeral directing or embalming,
or suspend or revoke the license of any applicant or licensee if the Mayor finds that the applicant
or licensee has:”.
(2) Paragraph (8) is amended to read as follows:
“(8) Engaged in misrepresentation or fraud in the conduct of the business of a
funeral services establishment as a funeral director, embalmer, or apprentice;”.
(h) Section 12 (D.C. Official Code § 3-411) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows;
“(a) No person shall engage in the practice of funeral directing or embalming in the
District of Columbia without being licensed in accordance with this act.”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) No funeral services establishment licensee shall engage in, or permit any employee
or agent to engage in, the practices of funeral directing or embalming unless the person
performing these duties is a funeral director or embalmer licensed pursuant to this act or an
apprentice approved pursuant to this act and under the direct or immediate supervision of a
licensed funeral director or embalmer as required by this act. The direct or immediate
supervision requirement shall not extend to employees whose duties are limited to the business
management activities of the establishment.”.
(3) Subsection (e) is amended to read as follows:
“(e) No person licensed as a funeral director or embalmer, approved for an
apprenticeship, or licensed to operate a funeral services establishment shall allow any other
person to use or practice under his or her license.”.
(i) Section 15 (D.C. Official Code § 3-414) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 15. Services requiring direct supervision by an embalmer.
“The handling, preparation, or embalming of human remains shall at all times be done by
a licensed embalmer, or in the case of an embalming apprentice, under the direct supervision of a
licensed embalmer.”.
(j) Section 17(a) (D.C. Official Code § 3-416(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) Any person holding a funeral director’s license or an embalmer’s license, or any
person approved for an apprenticeship, shall, within 5 days after any change of business or
residence address, notify the Mayor in writing of the change.”.
(k) Section 20 (D.C. Official Code § 3-419) is amended by striking the phrase “or
apprentice funeral directing” and inserting the phrase “the unlawful practice of embalming, the
unlawful practice of apprentice funeral directing or embalming” in its place.
(l) Section 22b (D.C. Official Code § 3-421) is amended to read as follows:
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“Sec. 22b. Services requiring immediate supervision.
“(a) A funeral directing apprentice shall not perform the following services unless he or
she is under the immediate supervision of a licensed funeral director:
“(1) The handling or preparing human remains for identification, viewing,
transportation, funeral services, or disposition;
“(2) Conducting or directing a funeral; or
“(3) Advising consumers making arrangements for the care and disposition of
human remains, including arrangements made prior to the death of a person.
“(b) An embalming apprentice shall not perform the following services unless he or she is
under the immediate supervision of a licensed embalmer:
“(1) Embalming human remains, including the preservation, disinfection,
sanitization, or treatment of human remains for the purpose of delaying decomposition;
“(2) Performing any procedure involving arterial injection, cavity treatment,
tissue preservation, restorative treatment, or other preparation of human remains that constitutes
embalming; or
“(3) The removal or transport of human remains when such removal or transport
is performed for the purpose of embalming or in connection with embalming services.”.
Sec. 3. Section 47-2853.06(f) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
striking the phrase “5 members of whom 4 shall be funeral directors licensed in the District and
one shall be a consumer member and inserting the phrase “7 members of whom 4 shall be
funeral directors licensed in the District, 2 shall be consumer members, and one shall be a
member with expertise in cremation or alkaline hydrolysis” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1 206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
7